Washington statutes.
RCW 43.168.090

Use of federal community development block grant funds.

The department shall use for the fund an amount of federal community development block grant funds equal to the amount of state funds transferred or appropriated to the department for purposes of supplementing the department's block grant funds.

[ 2005 c 136 s 8; 1985 c 164 s 9.]

NOTES:

Savings—Effective date—2005 c 136: See notes following RCW 43.168.020.